Utah statutes.
47-1-7.   Bond to secure abatement -- Procedure.

If the owner appears and pays all costs of the proceeding and files a bond, with sureties to be approved by the clerk, in the full value of the property, to be ascertained by the court, or in vacation by the clerk, auditor and treasurer of the county, conditioned that he will immediately abate the nuisance and prevent the same from being established or kept therein within a period of one year thereafter, the court or the judge may, if satisfied of his good faith, order the premises that have been closed under the order of abatement to be delivered to the owner, and the order of abatement may be canceled so far as the same may relate to said property; and, if the proceeding is an action in equity and such bond is given and costs therein paid before judgment and order of abatement, the action shall be thereby abated as to the building only. The release of the property under the provisions of this section shall not release it from any judgment, lien, penalty or liability to which it may be subject by law.

